Arkansas, session 2025, SB367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 8, Chapter 5, Subchapter 8, is
repealed.
Subchapter 8 — Small Business Revolving Loan Fund for Pollution Control and
Prevention Technologies Act

8-5-801. Title.
This subchapter may be called the “Small Business Revolving Loan Fund
for Pollution Control and Prevention Technologies Act”.

8-5-802. Purpose.
It is the purpose of this subchapter to authorize the Division of
Environmental Quality to establish and administer a revolving loan fund to
encourage the investment in pollution control and prevention technologies in
*JMB238*
04-01-2025 14:18:56 JMB238

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 SB367
Arkansas. The fund will promote sustainable economic development in Arkansas
by establishing a publicly capitalized fund to make loans to small businesses
for projects to meet regulatory mandates in pollution control, to adopt
pollution prevention technologies, or to implement waste reduction practices.

8-5-803. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Applicant” means any business concern operating within the
State of Arkansas that meets the criteria of a person, corporation,
partnership, or other business organization;
(2) “Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and
Ecology Commission;
(3)(A) “Pollution prevention” means reducing or eliminating the
generation of pollutants and waste at the source.
(B) “Pollution prevention” includes:
(i) Process modifications and equipment acquisitions
that promote the recovery and reuse of pollutants; and
(ii) The acquisition and installation of capital
equipment, a process change, or a combination of capital equipment and
process change.
(C) “Pollution prevention” does not include investments in
waste treatment processes or equipment, unless the waste treatment involves
the recovery and reuse of pollutants; and
(4)(A) “Waste reduction” means handling or processing waste
materials in a way that ultimately reduces the total quantity of waste
disposed.
(B) “Waste reduction” includes process modifications and
equipment acquisitions that promote the recovery, reuse, or recycling of
pollutants and wastes.

8-5-804. Eligible activities.
(a) Moneys deposited into the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund
within the Division of Environmental Quality may be:
(1) Loaned to eligible participants to pay the direct costs of
projects which are designed to correct or avoid violations of federal
environmental regulations or state environmental rules and have received a
04-01-2025 14:18:56 JMB238

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 SB367
certificate of need from the division; or
(2) Expended to pay costs incurred by the division to provide
management of lending activities.
(b)(1) It is the purpose of this subchapter to authorize the division
to establish and administer a revolving loan fund to encourage the investment
in pollution control, pollution prevention, and waste reduction practices in
Arkansas.
(2) Such a fund will promote sustainable economic development in
Arkansas by establishing a publicly capitalized revolving loan fund to make
loans to small businesses for projects to meet regulatory mandates in
pollution control or to adopt pollution prevention technologies.
(3) Operating expenses associated with proofing a process change
or equipment modification would be an eligible loan activity.

8-5-805. Eligible applicants.
(a) An eligible applicant shall:
(1) Employ one hundred (100) or fewer individuals, including
both full-time and part-time employees, through direct hiring or contract,
including affiliates and subsidiaries, at the time an application for a loan
is received by the Division of Environmental Quality;
(2) Provide proof of profitable operations and a demonstrated
ability to repay the loan; and
(3) Submit an application supplied by the division including any
supporting documents, instruments, or other documents requested by the
division for the purposes of recommending approval or disapproval of a loan
described in this section.
(b)(1) Until all delinquent fees stated in this subsection or
otherwise owed to the division are paid in full and no balance is due, the
Director of the Division of Environmental Quality shall not approve any loan
application.
(2) The delinquent fees include, but are not limited to:
(A) Permit fees;
(B) Permit modification fees;
(C) License fees;
(D) Certification fees;
(E) Registration fees;
04-01-2025 14:18:56 JMB238

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 SB367
(F) Variance application fees;
(G) Civil penalties;
(H) Emergency response reimbursements;
(I) Loan payments; and
(J) Review fees.

8-5-806. Terms of the revolving loan.
(a)(1) The maximum loan amount shall be:
(A) Forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) per mandated
pollution control project;
(B) Forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) per pollution
prevention project; and
(C) Forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) per waste
reduction project.
(2) The maximum allowable amount to be loaned shall not exceed
sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) per individual applicant.
(b) The maximum term of the loan shall be ten (10) years per mandated
pollution control project and ten (10) years per pollution prevention or
waste reduction project.
(c) The interest rate shall be:
(1) Established by the Division of Environmental Quality at or
below market rate; and
(2) Fixed for the term of each loan at the rate that is in
effect when the loan application is received or when the loan is closed,
whichever is lower.
(d)(1) The borrower shall be required to make level monthly amortizing
payments to retire the debt by the end of the loan term.
(2) Loan principal may be repaid in part or in full at any time
without penalty.
(e)(1) The division may:
(A) Make secured or unsecured loans with a promissory
note;
(B) Collect interest on any loans issued; and
(C) Assess penalties on late loan payments.
(2) Loans issued under this subchapter may contain an
acceleration clause.
04-01-2025 14:18:56 JMB238

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 SB367
(f) The division may bring any lawful action to recover any loan that
is in default.

8-5-807. Small Business Revolving Loan Fund.
(a) There is created within the Division of Environmental Quality a
revolving loan fund:
(1) Which shall be designated the “Small Business Revolving Loan
Fund”;
(2) Into which shall be transferred or deposited the moneys to
be provided by law for the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund; and
(3) To be used as a revolving fund by the division for making
loans to eligible participants to pay the direct costs of projects that are
designed to correct or avoid violations of federal environmental law or
regulation or state environmental rules and have received a certificate of
need from the division or to pay costs incurred by the division to provide
management of lending activities.
(b)(1) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State,
the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Small Business Revolving Loan Fund”.
(2) The Small Business Revolving Loan Fund shall consist of the
following:
(A) All funds transferred from the General Improvement
Fund or its successor fund or fund accounts, including the Development and
Enhancement Fund, to be otherwise provided by law for the Small Business
Revolving Loan Fund;
(B) All moneys received by the division upon repayment of
loans made from the furnishing of funds for loans under the program created
by this subchapter;
(C) Interest earned upon any money in the Small Business
Revolving Loan Fund; and
(D) All sums recovered upon by the Small Business
Revolving Loan Fund for losses to the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund or
for loan losses under the loan program created in this subchapter and all
other moneys received for the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund from any
source.
(c)(1) Subject to the provisions of this subchapter, the division is
04-01-2025 14:18:56 JMB238

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 SB367
vested with full power, authority, and jurisdiction over the Small Business
Revolving Loan Fund, including all moneys and property or securities
belonging to the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund.
(2) The division may invest the Small Business Revolving Loan
Fund in direct general obligations of the United States, in certificates of
deposit or savings accounts in an amount not to exceed the capital funds,
represented by capital, surplus, and undivided profits in financial
institutions located in Arkansas that are insured by an agency of the United
States Government, and in repurchase agreements that are collateralized by
direct general obligations of the United States or by bonds, notes,
debentures, participation certificates, or other obligations issued by an
agency of the United States, the principal and interest of which are
guaranteed by the agency or the United States.

8-5-808. Administration of program.
The Division of Environmental Quality will manage the program through
its Small Business Assistance Program. The program is authorized to delegate
the management of the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund. The division shall
retain the power to issue certificates of need for eligible projects and
shall not delegate such authority.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1105 is repealed.
19-5-1105. Small Business Revolving Loan Fund.
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Small Business Revolving Loan Fund”.
(b)(1) The Small Business Revolving Loan Fund shall consist of moneys
transferred from the General Improvement Fund or its successor fund or fund
accounts, including the Development and Enhancement Fund, interest earnings,
repayment of loans, and moneys recovered for loan losses under the loan
program created in the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund for Pollution
Control and Prevention Technologies Act, § 8-5-801 et seq., and any other
moneys made available by law or from any other source.
(2) The Small Business Revolving Loan Fund shall be administered
by the Division of Environmental Quality and used exclusively for those
purposes set out in the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund for Pollution
04-01-2025 14:18:56 JMB238

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 SB367
Control and Prevention Technologies Act, § 8-5-801 et seq.

/s/Irvin

































04-01-2025 14:18:56 JMB238